California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) An individual registered dental hygienist in alternative practice or a pair of registered dental hygienists in alternative practice who practice dental hygiene under a name that would otherwise violate Section 1960 may practice under that name if the licensees hold a valid permit issued
 by the dental hygiene board under this section. The dental hygiene board shall issue a written permit authorizing the holder to use a name specified in the permit in connection with the holder’s practice if the dental hygiene board finds all of the following:

(1) The applicant or applicants are duly licensed registered dental hygienists in alternative practice.

(2) The place where the applicant or applicants practice is owned or leased by the applicant or applicants, and the practice conducted at the place is wholly owned and entirely controlled by the applicant or applicants and is an approved area or practice setting pursuant to Section 1926.

(3) The name under which the applicant or applicants propose to operate
 contains at least one of the following designations: “dental hygiene group,” “dental hygiene practice,” or “dental hygiene office,” contains the family name of one or more of the past, present, or prospective associates, partners, shareholders, or members of the group, and is in conformity with Section 651 and not in violation of subdivisions (i) and (l) of Section 1950.5.

(4) All licensed persons practicing at the location designated in the application hold valid licenses and no charges of unprofessional conduct are pending against any person practicing at that location.

(c) A permit issued under this section shall expire and become invalid unless renewed in the manner provided for in this article for the renewal of permits issued under this article.

(d) A permit issued under this section may be revoked or suspended if the dental hygiene board finds that any requirement for original issuance of a permit is no longer being fulfilled by the permitholder. Proceedings for revocation or suspension shall be governed by the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(e) If charges of unprofessional conduct are filed against the holder of a permit issued under this section, or a member of an association, partnership, group, or corporation to whom a permit has been issued under this section, proceedings shall not be commenced for revocation or suspension of the permit until a final determination of the charges of unprofessional conduct, unless the
 charges have resulted in revocation or suspension of a license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 47.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1963.

The dental hygiene board may file a complaint for violation of any part of this article with any court of competent jurisdiction and may, by its officers, counsel, and agents, assist in presenting the law or facts at the trial. The district attorney of each county in this state shall prosecute all violations of this article in their respective counties in which the violations occur.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 48.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1964.

In addition to the other proceedings provided for in this article, on application of the dental hygiene board, the superior court of any county shall issue an injunction to restrain an unlicensed person from conducting the practice of dental hygiene, as defined in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 49.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1965.

If a person has engaged in or is about to engage in an act that constitutes an offense against this chapter, the superior court of any county, on application of 10 or more persons holding licenses to practice dental hygiene issued under this article, may issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining that conduct. Proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 31, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative July 1, 2009, by Sec. 55 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the dental hygiene board seek ways and means to identify and rehabilitate licensees whose competency may be impaired due to abuse of dangerous drugs or alcohol, so that licensees so afflicted may be treated and returned to the practice of dental hygiene in a manner that will not endanger the public health and safety. It is also the intent of the Legislature that the dental hygiene board establish a diversion program as a voluntary alternative approach to traditional disciplinary actions.

(b) One or more diversion evaluation committees shall be established by the dental hygiene board. The dental hygiene board shall establish
 criteria for the selection of each diversion evaluation committee. Each member of a diversion evaluation committee shall receive per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 50.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.1.

(a) The dental hygiene board shall establish criteria for the acceptance, denial, or termination of licensees in a diversion program. Unless ordered by the dental hygiene board as a condition of a licensee’s disciplinary probation, only those licensees who have voluntarily requested diversion treatment and supervision by a diversion evaluation committee shall participate in a diversion program.

(b) A licensee who is not the subject of a current investigation may self-refer to the diversion program on a confidential basis, except as provided in subdivision (f).

(c) A licensee under current investigation by the dental hygiene board
 may also request entry into a diversion program by contacting the dental hygiene board. The dental hygiene board may refer the licensee requesting participation in the program to a diversion evaluation committee for evaluation of eligibility. Prior to authorizing a licensee to enter into the diversion program, the dental hygiene board may require the licensee, while under current investigation for any violations of this article or other violations, to execute a statement of understanding that states that the licensee understands that the licensee’s violations of this article or other statutes, that would otherwise be the basis for discipline, may still be investigated and be the subject of disciplinary action.

(d) If the reasons for a current investigation of a licensee are based primarily on the self-administration of any controlled substance
 or dangerous drugs or alcohol under Section 1951, or the illegal possession, prescription, or nonviolent procurement of any controlled substance or dangerous drugs for self-administration that does not involve actual, direct harm to the public, the dental hygiene board shall close the investigation without further action if the licensee is accepted into the dental hygiene board’s diversion program and successfully completes the requirements of the program. If the licensee withdraws or is terminated from the program by a diversion evaluation committee, the investigation shall be reopened and disciplinary action imposed, if warranted, as determined by the dental hygiene board.

(e) Neither acceptance nor participation in the diversion program shall preclude the dental hygiene board from investigating or continuing to investigate, or taking
 disciplinary action or continuing to take disciplinary action against, any licensee for any unprofessional conduct committed before, during, or after participation in the diversion program.

(f) All licensees shall sign an agreement of understanding that the withdrawal or termination from the diversion program at a time when a diversion evaluation committee determines the licensee presents a threat to the public’s health and safety shall result in the utilization by the dental hygiene board of diversion treatment records in disciplinary or criminal proceedings.

(g) Any licensee terminated from the diversion program for failure to comply with program requirements is subject to disciplinary action by the dental hygiene board for acts committed before, during, and after participation in
 the diversion program. A licensee who has been under investigation by the dental hygiene board and has been terminated from the diversion program by a diversion evaluation committee shall be reported by the diversion evaluation committee to the dental hygiene board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 51.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.2.

Each diversion evaluation committee shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

(a) To evaluate those licensees who request to participate in the diversion program according to the guidelines prescribed by the dental hygiene board and to consider the recommendations of any licensees designated by the dental hygiene board to serve as consultants on the admission of the licensee to the diversion program.

(b) To review and designate those treatment facilities to which licensees in a diversion program may be referred.

(c) To receive and review information concerning a licensee
 participating in the program.

(d) To consider in the case of each licensee participating in a program whether the licensee may safely continue or resume the practice of dental hygiene.

(e) To perform other related duties as the dental hygiene board may by regulation require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 52.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.3.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, relating to public meetings, a diversion evaluation committee may convene in closed session to consider reports pertaining to any licentiate requesting or participating in a diversion program. A diversion evaluation committee shall only convene in closed session to the extent that it is necessary to protect the privacy of a licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 31, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative July 1, 2009, by Sec. 55 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.4.

Each licensee who requests participation in a diversion program shall agree to cooperate with the treatment program designed by a diversion evaluation committee and to bear all costs related to the program, unless the cost is waived by the dental hygiene board. Any failure to comply with the provisions of a treatment program may result in termination of the licensee’s participation in a program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 53.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.5.

(a) After a diversion evaluation committee, in its discretion, has determined that a licensee has been rehabilitated and the diversion program is completed, the diversion evaluation committee shall purge and destroy all records pertaining to the licensee’s participation in the diversion program.

(b) Except as authorized by subdivision (f) of Section 1966.1, all dental hygiene board and diversion evaluation committee records and records of proceedings pertaining to the treatment of a licensee in a program shall be kept confidential and are not subject to discovery or subpoena.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 54.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.6.

The dental hygiene board shall provide for the representation of any person making reports to a diversion evaluation committee or the dental hygiene board under this article in any action for defamation for reports or information given to the diversion evaluation committee or the dental hygiene board regarding a licensee’s participation in the diversion program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 55.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.1. Registered Dental Hygienist in Alternative Practice Corporations [1967. - 1967.4.]

1967.

A registered dental hygienist in alternative practice corporation is a professional corporation that is authorized to render professional services, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, so long as that professional corporation and its shareholders, officers, directors, and professional employees rendering professional services are in compliance with the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act (commencing with Section 13400) of Part 4 of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, this article, and all other statutes and regulations now or hereafter adopted pertaining to the professional corporation and the conduct of its affairs. With respect to a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice corporation, the governmental agency referred to in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act is the Dental Hygiene Board of
 California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 858, Sec. 60.   (SB 1482)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1967.1.

It shall constitute unprofessional conduct and a violation of this article for any person licensed under this article to violate, attempt to violate, directly or indirectly, assist in or abet the violation of, or conspire to violate any provision or term of this article, the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act, or any regulations duly adopted under those laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 516, Sec. 2.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1967.2.

A licensee employed by, or practicing in, a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice corporation pursuant to Section 13401.5 of the Corporations Code shall practice within the scope of their license and shall be subject to all applicable licensure provisions in their respective practice act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 516, Sec. 2.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1967.3.

The income of a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice corporation attributable to professional services rendered while a shareholder is a disqualified person, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, shall not in any manner accrue to the benefit of such shareholder or his or her shares in the registered dental hygienist in alternative practice corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 516, Sec. 2.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1967.4.

(a) The bylaws of a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice corporation shall include a provision whereby the capital stock of the professional corporation owned by a disqualified person, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, or a deceased person, shall be sold to the professional corporation or to the remaining shareholders of the professional corporation not later than 90 days after disqualification, if the shareholder becomes a disqualified person, or not later than six months after death, if the shareholder becomes deceased.

(b) A registered dental hygienist in alternative practice corporation shall provide
 adequate security by insurance or otherwise for claims against it by its patients arising out of the rendering of professional services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 516, Sec. 2.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.5. California Dental Corps Loan Repayment Program [1970. - 1976.]

1970.

There is hereby established in the Dental Board of California the Dental Corps Loan Repayment Program of 2002, which shall become operative on January 1, 2003. This program shall be known and may be cited as the California Dental Corps Loan Repayment Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 575, Sec. 1.   (AB 2485)   Effective September 24, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1970.5.

It is the intent of this article that the Dental Board of California implement the California Dental Corps Loan Repayment Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 575, Sec. 2.   (AB 2485)   Effective September 24, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1971.

As used in this article:

(a) “Account” means the Dentally Underserved Account established in Section 1973, which is contained within the fund.

(b) “Board” means the Dental Board of California.

(c) “Dentally underserved area” means a geographic area eligible to be designated as having a shortage of dental professionals pursuant to Part I of Appendix B to Part 5 of Chapter 1 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations or an area of the state in which unmet priority needs for dentists exist as determined by the
 California Healthcare Workforce Policy Commission pursuant to Section 128224 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) “Dentally underserved population” means persons without dental insurance and persons eligible for Denti-Cal who are population groups described as having a shortage of dental care professionals in Part I of Appendix B to Part 5 of Chapter 1 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(e) “Fund” means the State Dentistry Fund.

(f) “Medi-Cal threshold languages” means primary languages spoken by limited-English-proficient (LEP) population groups meeting a numeric threshold of 3,000 eligible LEP Medi-Cal beneficiaries residing in a county, 1,000 Medi-Cal
 eligible LEP beneficiaries residing in a single ZIP Code, or 1,500 LEP Medi-Cal beneficiaries residing in two contiguous ZIP Codes.

(g) “Program” means the California Dental Corps Loan Repayment Program.

(h) “Practice setting” means either of the following:

(1) A community clinic, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1204 and subdivision (c) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, a clinic owned or operated by a public hospital and health system, or a clinic owned and operated by a hospital that maintains the primary contract with a county government to fulfill the county’s role pursuant to Section 17000 of the Welfare and Institutions Code that is located in a dentally underserved area
 or at least 50 percent of whose patients are from a dentally underserved population.

(2) A dental practice or dental corporation, as defined in Section 1800, located in a dentally underserved area or at least 50 percent of whose patients are from a dentally underserved population.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 575, Sec. 4.   (AB 2485)   Effective September 24, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1972.

(a) (1) A program applicant shall possess a current valid license to practice dentistry in this state issued by the board pursuant to Section 1626, or be currently eligible for graduation from a predoctoral or postdoctoral dental education program approved by the Commission on Dental Accreditation or the board and meet all criteria for licensure, subject to successful completion of applicable education and examination requirements.

(2) An applicant shall submit a completed application provided by the board that shall include, but is not limited to, documentation detailing current loan obligations from any government or commercial lender obtained for purposes of financing tuition or fees at a dental school approved by the Commission on Dental Accreditation or the board. Documentation shall contain the applicant’s account number and the lender’s contact information, as well as current balance owing and monthly installment plan details, if applicable.

(3) An application shall include disclosure of any and all obligations for which the applicant has defaulted or been subject to a judgment lien within the last 10 years, and
 explanations for each default or judgment lien disclosed.

(4) An applicant, if selected to receive a repayment grant, shall sign an agreement with the board to maintain qualified employment for 36 months continuously, and that the qualified employment meets or once commenced will meet the minimum requirements of the program regarding practice setting, and clinical hours
 worked.

(5) An applicant shall also agree to provide an annual progress report, signed by both the applicant and employer or employer’s designee. A progress report shall verify the practice setting’s qualified status, clinical hours worked by the applicant, number of patients treated, specific treatment rendered and its value, and patient’s payer source.

(b) The board, in selecting a participant for the program, shall give priority consideration to an applicant who is best suited to meet the cultural and linguistic needs and demands of dentally underserved populations by demonstrating experience in one or more of the following areas:

(1) Speaks one or more Medi-Cal threshold languages.

(2) Comes from an economically disadvantaged background with economic, social, or other circumstances.

(3) Has worked in a health field in an underserved area or with an underserved population.

(4) Is a dentist specialist recognized by the American Dental Association or has met all eligibility requirements to graduate from a dental specialty residency program approved by the Commission on Dental Accreditation.

(5) Has completed an extramural program or rotation during dental school or postgraduate education in which the applicant provided services to a
 population that speaks any Medi-Cal threshold language.

(c) The practice setting shall meet one or both of the following criteria:

(1) The practice setting shall be located in a dentally underserved area.

(2) The practice setting shall ensure that the program participant serves a patient population that consists of at least 50 percent dentally underserved populations.

(d) A program applicant shall be working in, or have a signed agreement for future employment with, an eligible practice setting. The program participant shall be employed on a full-time basis. “Full-time basis” means 30 hours of clinical hands-on
 care per week, for no less than 45 weeks per year, except as provided for during customary holidays, personal or family illness, and vacation time as described in a separate employment agreement between the recipient and the practice setting. Upon 30-day notice to the board, the board shall grant an extended leave of absence period for serious illness, pregnancy, or other natural cause. The board may establish other exemptions to the minimum time requirements of this subdivision on a case-by-case basis.

(e) A program participant shall commit to a minimum of three years of service in one or more eligible practice settings. Loan repayment or grant disbursement shall be deferred until the dentist is employed on a full-time basis.

(f) The board may coordinate with local and statewide trade and professional dental organizations, as well as educational institutions, for outreach to potentially eligible applicants.

(g) The board shall develop a process for a program participant’s repayment of loans or grants disbursed in the event that the participant is terminated prior to completion of, or is otherwise unable to complete, his or her three years of service obligation. Cause for termination
 includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Recipient’s termination of full-time, qualified employment.

(2) Recipient’s failure to maintain his or her professional license in good standing.

(3) Recipient’s failure to comply with any other term or condition of this article.

(h) The board may adopt any other standards of eligibility, placement, and termination appropriate to achieve the aim of providing competent dental services in these approved practice settings.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 575, Sec. 6.   (AB 2485)   Effective September 24, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1973.

(a) The Dentally Underserved Account is hereby created in the State Dentistry Fund.

(b) The sum of three million dollars ($3,000,000) is hereby authorized to be expended from the State Dentistry Fund on this program. These moneys are appropriated as follows:

(1) One million dollars ($1,000,000) shall be transferred from the fund to the account on July 1, 2003. Of this amount, sixty-five thousand dollars ($65,000) shall be used by the board in the 2003–04 fiscal year for operating expenses necessary to manage this program.

(2) One million dollars
 ($1,000,000) shall be transferred from the fund to the account on July 1, 2004. Of this amount, sixty-five thousand dollars ($65,000) shall be used by the board in the 2004–05 fiscal year for operating expenses necessary to manage this program.

(3) One million dollars ($1,000,000) shall be transferred from the fund to the account on July 1, 2005. Of this amount, sixty-five thousand dollars ($65,000) shall be used by the board in the 2005–06 fiscal year for operating expenses necessary to manage this program.

(c) Funds placed into the account shall be used by the board to repay the loans per agreements made with dentists.

(1) Funds paid out for loan repayment may have a funding match from
 foundation or other private sources.

(2) Loan repayments shall not exceed one hundred five thousand dollars ($105,000) per individual licensed dentist.

(3) Loan repayments shall not exceed the amount of the educational loans incurred by the dentist applicant.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 11005 of the Government Code, the board may seek and receive matching funds from foundations and private sources to be placed into the account. The board also may contract with an exempt foundation for the receipt of matching funds to be transferred to the account for use by this program.

(e) Funds in the account appropriated in subdivision (b) or received pursuant to
 subdivision (d) are continuously appropriated for the repayment of loans per agreements made between the board and the dentists.

(f) On or after July 1, 2010, the board shall extend the program and distribute the moneys remaining in the account until all the moneys in the account are expended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 575, Sec. 7.   (AB 2485)   Effective September 24, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1975.

The terms of loan repayment granted under this article shall be as follows:

(a) After a program participant has been selected by the board to provide services as a dentist in the program, the board shall provide thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) for loan repayment annually, for three years, to reach a total of one hundred five thousand dollars ($105,000), or the total amount of the loan, whichever is the lesser amount.

(b) The initial disbursement of funds shall be made within 30 days from execution of a program agreement between the board and the recipient directly from the board to the qualified lender selected by
 the recipient, to be credited to the recipient’s account.

(c) Subsequent disbursements in sums equal to the initial disbursement, but not equaling more than the total amount owed by the recipient, shall be made within 30 days of months 13 and 25 of the recipient’s participation in the program.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 575, Sec. 9.   (AB 2485)   Effective September 24, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1976.

(a) The board shall report to the Legislature, during its sunset review period, the experience of the program since its inception, an evaluation of its effectiveness in improving access to dental care for underserved populations, and recommendations for maintaining or expanding its operation. The report to the Legislature shall also include the
 following:

(1) The number of program participants.

(2) The practice locations.

(3) The amount expended for the program.

(4) The information on annual progress reports by program participants.

(b) The report to the Legislature pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 575, Sec. 10.   (AB 2485)   Effective September 24, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Medicine [2000. - 2529.8.1.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [2000. - 2028.5.]

2000.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Medical Practice Act. Whenever a reference is made to the Medical Practice Act by the provisions of any statute, it is to be construed as referring to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2001.

(a) There is in the Department of Consumer Affairs a Medical Board of California that consists of 15 members, 7 of whom shall be public members.

(b) The Governor shall appoint 13 members to the board, subject to confirmation by the Senate, 5 of whom shall be public members. The Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint a public member.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed. Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of this section renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 294, Sec. 2.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2001.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Medical Board of California in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 107, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

2002.

Unless otherwise expressly provided, the term “board” as used in this chapter means the Medical Board of California. As used in this chapter or any other provision of law, “Division of Medical Quality” and “Division of Licensing” shall be deemed to refer to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 678, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2004.

The board shall have the responsibility for the following:

(a) The enforcement of the disciplinary and criminal provisions of the Medical Practice Act.

(b) The administration and hearing of disciplinary actions.

(c) Carrying out disciplinary actions appropriate to findings made by a panel or an administrative law judge.

(d) Suspending, revoking, or otherwise limiting certificates after the conclusion of disciplinary actions.

(e) Reviewing the quality of medical practice carried out by physician and surgeon certificate holders under the jurisdiction of the board.

(f) Approving undergraduate and graduate medical education programs.

(g) Approving clinical clerkship and special programs and hospitals for the programs in subdivision (f).

(h) Issuing licenses and certificates under the board’s jurisdiction.

(i) Administering the board’s continuing medical education program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 678, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2006.

(a) Any reference in this chapter to an investigation by the board shall be deemed to refer to a joint investigation conducted by employees of the Department of Justice and the Health Quality Investigation Unit under the vertical enforcement and prosecution model, as specified in Section 12529.6 of the Government Code.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 6) and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 515, Sec. 7.   (SB 304)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2007.

Members of the board shall only be appointed from persons who have been residents of this state for at least the five-year period preceding their appointment. Members of the board, except the public members, shall only be appointed from persons licensed as physicians and surgeons in this state. No person who in any manner owns any interest in any college, school, or institution engaged in medical instruction shall be appointed to the board. Four of the physician members of the board shall hold faculty appointments in a clinical department of an approved medical school in the state, but not more than four members of the board may hold full-time appointments to the faculties of such medical schools.

The public members shall not be licensees of the
 board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 294, Sec. 3.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2008.

The board may appoint panels from its members for the purpose of fulfilling the obligations established in subdivision (c) of Section 2004. Any panel appointed under this section shall at no time be comprised of less than four members and the number of public members assigned to the panel shall not exceed the number of licensed physician and surgeon members assigned to the panel. Each panel shall annually elect a chair and a vice chair.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 18.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2010.

Each member of the board shall be appointed for a term of four years.

Vacancies occuring on the board shall be filled by appointment of the appointing power for the unexpired term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 676, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2011.

The appointing power may remove any member of the board for neglect of duty required by this chapter, incompetency, or unprofessional conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 676, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

2012.

The board shall elect a president, a vice president, and a secretary from its members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 678, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2013.

(a) The board and a panel appointed under this chapter may convene from time to time as deemed necessary by the board.

(b) Four members of a panel of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of the panel. Eight members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any board meeting.

(c) It shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of those members present at a board or panel meeting, those members constituting at least a quorum, to pass any motion, resolution, or measure. A decision by a panel to discipline a physician and surgeon shall require an affirmative vote, at a meeting or by mail, of a majority of the members of that panel; except that a decision to revoke the certificate of a physician and surgeon shall require the affirmative vote of four members of that panel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 678, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2014.

Notice of each meeting of the board shall be given in accordance with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 678, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2015.

The president of the board may call meetings of any duly appointed and created committee or panel of the board at a specified time and place.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 678, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2015.5.

The board may establish advisory committees consisting of persons who have a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate issued by the board that is in good standing and members of the public with interest or knowledge of the subject matter assigned to the committee. Members of an advisory committee need not be members of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 843, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2016.

Each member of the board and its committees shall receive per diem and travel expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2017.

The board and each committee or panel shall keep an official record of all their proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 678, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2018.

The board may adopt, amend, or repeal, in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, those regulations as may be necessary to enable it to carry into effect the provisions of law relating to the practice of medicine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 678, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2019.

The office of the board shall be in the City of Sacramento. Suboffices may be established in the Cities of Los Angeles, San Diego, and San Francisco or the environs of such cities. Notwithstanding any other law, legal proceedings against the board shall be instituted in any one of these four cities. The board may also establish other suboffices as it may deem necessary and such records as may be necessary may be transferred temporarily to any suboffices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 294, Sec. 4.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2020.

(a) The board, by and with the approval of the director, may employ an executive director exempt from the provisions of the Civil Service Act and may also employ investigators, legal counsel, medical consultants, and other assistance as it may deem necessary to carry this chapter into effect. The board may fix the compensation to be paid for services subject to the provisions of applicable state laws and regulations and may incur other expenses as it may deem necessary. Investigators employed by the board shall be provided special training in investigating medical practice activities.

(b) The Attorney General shall act as legal counsel for the board for any judicial and administrative proceedings and the services of the Attorney General shall be a charge against
 it.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 294, Sec. 5.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2021.

(a) If the board publishes a directory pursuant to Section 112, it may require persons licensed pursuant to this chapter to furnish any information as it may deem necessary to enable it to compile the directory.

(b) Each licensee shall report to the board each and every change of address, including an email address, within 30 days after each change, giving both the old and new address. If an address reported to the board at the time of application for licensure or subsequently is a post office box, the applicant shall also provide the board with a street address. If another address is the licensee’s address of record, the licensee may request that the second address not be disclosed to the public.
